basic-cs.aff
FLAG long
SFX L1 Y 55
SFX L1   0           a          [^nk]
SFX L1   0           u          [^nk]
SFX L1   0           e          [^kn]
SFX L1   k           ce         yk
SFX L1   0           ě          [bdfmptvw]
SFX L1   0           em         [^nk]
SFX L1   0           y          [^nk]
SFX L1   0           ů          [^nk]
SFX L1   0           ům         [^nk]
SFX L1   0           ech        [bdflmprtvz]
SFX L1   0           ách        [gh]
SFX L1   g           zích       g
SFX L1   h           zích       [^c]h
SFX L1   ch          ších       ch
SFX L1   0           ích        [cčjřsšž]
SFX L1   ek          ka         ek
SFX L1   ek          ku         ek
SFX L1   ek          kem        ek
SFX L1   ek          ky         ek
SFX L1   ek          ků         ek
SFX L1   ek          kům        ek
SFX L1   ek          cích       ek
SFX L1   ek          kách       íček
SFX L1   0           a          [^e]k
SFX L1   0           u          [^e]k
SFX L1   0           em         [^e]k
SFX L1   0           y          [^e]k
SFX L1   0           ů          [^e]k
SFX L1   0           ům         [^e]k
SFX L1   k           cích       [^e]k
SFX L1   0           a          men
SFX L1   0           u          men
SFX L1   0           e          men
SFX L1   0           em         men
SFX L1   0           y          men
SFX L1   0           ů          men
SFX L1   0           ům         men
SFX L1   0           ech        men
SFX L1   en          na         [^m]en
SFX L1   en          nu         [^m]en
SFX L1   en          ne         [^m]en
SFX L1   en          nem        [^m]en
SFX L1   en          ny         [^m]en
SFX L1   en          nů         [^m]en
SFX L1   en          nům        [^m]en
SFX L1   en          nech       [^m]en
SFX L1   0           a          [^e]n
SFX L1   0           u          [^e]n
SFX L1   0           e          [^e]n
SFX L1   0           ě          [áéíý]n
SFX L1   0           em         [^e]n
SFX L1   0           y          [^e]n
SFX L1   0           ů          [^e]n
SFX L1   0           ům         [^e]n
SFX L1   0           ech        [^e]n

SFX S1 Y 45
SFX S1   0           e          [^eíěcňť]
SFX S1   0           i          [^eíěcňť]
SFX S1   0           em         [^eíěcňť]
SFX S1   0           ů          [^eíěcň]
SFX S1   0           ům         [^eíěcň]
SFX S1   0           ích        [^eíěcňťnlsz]
SFX S1   0           y          n
SFX S1   0           ech        [nsz]
SFX S1   0           ech        íl
SFX S1   0           ích        [^í]l
SFX S1   ec          ce         ec
SFX S1   ec          ci         ec
SFX S1   ec          cem        ec
SFX S1   ec          ců         ec
SFX S1   ec          cům        ec
SFX S1   ec          cích       ec
SFX S1   0           e          [^e]c
SFX S1   0           i          [^e]c
SFX S1   0           em         [^e]c
SFX S1   0           ů          [^e]c
SFX S1   0           ům         [^e]c
SFX S1   0           ích        [^e]c
SFX S1   ť           tě         ť
SFX S1   ť           ti         ť
SFX S1   ť           těm        ť
SFX S1   ť           tích       ť
SFX S1   eň          ně         eň
SFX S1   eň          ni         eň
SFX S1   eň          ňů         eň
SFX S1   eň          ňům        eň
SFX S1   eň          něm        eň
SFX S1   eň          ních       eň
SFX S1   ň           ně         [^e]ň
SFX S1   ň           ni         [^e]ň
SFX S1   0           ů          [^e]ň
SFX S1   0           ům         [^e]ň
SFX S1   ň           něm        [^e]ň
SFX S1   ň           ních       [^e]ň
SFX S1   0           m          í
SFX S1   0           ch         í
SFX S1   0           mi         í
SFX S1   e           i          e
SFX S1   e           í          e
SFX S1   ě           i          ě
SFX S1   ě           í          ě
