basic-cs.dic
albertov/L1
anton/L1
apríl/H1L1S1
aranžování/S1N1
bakov/L1
bardejov/L1
barrandov/L1
barvení/S1N1
batelov/L1
bavorák/L1H1
bedřichov/L1
benešov/L1
berlín/L1
beroun/L1R1P1V1XD
betlém/L1
bezděkov/L1
bezvětří/S1
bečov/L1
beňov/L1
blahopřání/S1N1
blaník/H1L1P1V1XD
bludov/L1
bláznovství/S1
bohumín/L1R1
bombardování/S1N1
boršov/L1
boubín/L1P1V1XD
bousov/L1
bouzov/L1
božkov/L1
brandýs/L1P1V1XD
braník/L1
broumov/L1
broušení/S1N1
brumov/L1
brušperk/L1
buchlov/L1
budišov/L1
budíkov/L1
buzení/S1N1
buřt/H1L1
bydžov/L1
bzenec/S1
bítov/L1
bělov/L1P1V1XD
břevnov/L1
březen/L1
břich/L1
cestování/S1N1
chanov/L1
chlebíček/Q1L1
chlév/L1
chodov/L1
chomutov/L1
chotěšov/L1
chránič/S1
chápání/S1N1
chýnov/L1
cvikov/L1
cypřiš/S1
darkov/L1
depozitář/S1
divišov/L1
dlabačov/L1R1
dláždění/S1N1
dnešek/L1
dobříkov/L1
dodržení/S1N1
dokončení/S1N1
domašov/L1
domov/L1
dopisování/S1N1
doručování/S1N1
dotování/S1N1
došetření/S1N1
droždín/L1
dráždění/S1N1
duben/L1
duchcov/L1
dání/S1N1
dějepisectví/S1
děvín/L1
děčín/L1R1
egypt/L1
elektrospotřebič/S1
fiat/L1H1
financování/S1N1
fotografování/S1N1
frymburk/L1
gdaňsk/L1
gottwaldov/L1
grabštejn/L1
greenwich/S1
grygov/L1
habartov/L1
halenkov/L1
haraburdí/S1
harrachov/L1
havířov/L1
helfštýn/L1
herectví/S1N1
hloubětín/L1R1
hlučín/L1R1
hlášení/S1N1
hněvotín/L1R1
hodonín/L1R1
hokej/S1
holešov/L1
holýšov/L1
hostinec/S1
hostýn/L1
hrazení/S1N1
hronov/L1
hrozenkov/L1
hroznětín/L1R1
hrušov/L1
hulín/L1R1P1V1XD
husinec/S1
házení/S1N1
hřbitov/L1
hřebčín/L1
investování/S1N1
jablunkov/L1
jankov/L1P1V1XD
janov/L1P1V1XD
jarov/L1
jarošov/L1
javorník/L1
jazyk/L1
jemnice/S1
jeruzalém/L1
jeseník/L1
ječmen/L1S1R1
jilemnice/S1
jindřichov/L1
jinín/L1
jirkov/L1
jičín/L1R1
jiřetín/L1R1
jiříkov/L1
joint/H1L1
josefov/L1
jáchymov/L1R1
jáství/S1
kalašnikov/L1
kalich/H1L1
kamenec/S1
kamýk/L1
karlov/L1
karlín/L1P1V1XD
karlštejn/L1R1
kaznějov/L1
kačerov/L1
kišiněv/L1
kladení/S1N1
klonování/S1N1
klárov/L1
klášter/L1R1
klín/H1L1
knihovnictví/S1
knín/L1R1
kocourkov/L1
kojetín/L1R1P1V1XD
kolín/L1R1P1V1XD
kolísání/S1N1
kombík/H1L1
komárov/L1
komín/H1L1R1
koniklec/S1
kopec/S1
kostel/L1
kostelec/S1
kostelík/L1
kounov/L1
kousek/Q1L1
kout/B1T1N1H1L1R1
koutek/L1Q1
koučování/S1N1
kovářov/L1
kozlov/L1P1V1XD
kozák/P1I1L1XD
kozákov/L1
košťálov/L1
kraj/S1
krakov/L1
kramolín/L1R1
kravín/H1L1
krnov/L1
kroužení/S1N1
krumlov/L1
krumsín/L1R1
královec/S1U1V1XD
kulich/L1
kunín/L1R1
květen/L1
květináč/S1
kyjev/L1
kyjov/L1
kynšperk/L1
křelov/L1
křemen/S1
landštejn/L1
lanškroun/L1R1
lapač/S1
leden/L1
lemberk/L1P1V1XD
les/L1
lesík/L1
letov/L1
letošek/L1
lešení/S1
libušín/L1R1
liběchov/L1
lichnov/L1
lipník/L1
lisování/S1N1
litvínov/L1
lišov/L1
lochkov/L1
lochotín/L1R1
londýn/L1P1V1XD
loučení/S1N1
lukov/L1
lutín/L1R1
lvov/L1
lázeňství/S1
lískovec/S1U1V1XD
manětín/L1R1
mapování/S1N1
maršov/L1
medlov/L1
mezidobí/S1
mikrosvět/L1
mikrořadič/S1
mikulov/L1
milín/L1R1
mlýn/L1
mlčení/S1N1
mnichov/L1
mohuč/S1
motol/L1
mošnov/L1
mrknutí/S1N1
muglinov/L1
máj/S1
mírov/L1
míč/S1
mělník/L1
měčín/L1R1
měšec/S1
nadloží/S1
nahrávač/S1
nalezení/S1N1
napadení/S1N1
napomáhání/S1N1
narůstání/S1N1
nastoupení/S1N1
natírání/S1N1
navyšování/S1N1
nazaret/H1L1
nařčení/S1N1
nepomuk/L1
neveklov/L1
neředín/L1R1
nicnedělání/S1
norimberk/L1
nymburk/L1R1
náboj/S1
národ/L1
nároží/S1
náčiní/S1
obdélník/H1L1
obhospodařování/S1N1
oblečení/S1N1
obohacení/S1N1
obsazování/S1N1
obyčej/S1
oběd/L1
ochlazování/S1N1
odbourávání/S1N1
odebrání/S1N1
odevzdávání/S1N1
odkrytí/S1N1
odmítání/S1N1
odprodej/S1
odstavec/S1
odsíření/S1N1
odvrácení/S1N1
odříkání/S1N1
ohlédnutí/S1N1
ohře/S1
olešnice/S1
ondřejov/L1
opalování/S1N1
opatov/L1
oplodnění/S1N1
oproštění/S1N1
osamění/S1N1
ostrov/L1
ostění/S1
osvícení/S1N1
oteplování/S1N1
otáčení/S1N1
ovzduší/S1
označování/S1N1
očkování/S1N1
pacov/L1
padělání/S1N1
panování/S1N1
paskov/L1
pasov/L1
pavlov/L1P1V1XD
pačejov/L1
pekařství/S1
pelhřimov/L1
pernštejn/L1
perštejn/L1R1
perštýn/L1R1
petrov/L1P1V1XD
petříkov/L1
petřín/L1R1
pilíř/S1
pivín/L1R1
pletí/S1N1
plumlov/L1
plácnutí/S1N1
pobaltí/S1
pochybení/S1N1
podepsání/S1N1
podlaží/S1
podpalubí/S1
podvečer/L1
podání/S1N1
pohnutí/S1N1
pohřbení/S1N1
pojmenování/S1N1
pokojík/H1L1
pokoření/S1N1
pokárání/S1N1
poloostrov/L1
políbení/S1N1
ponižování/S1N1
popel/H1L1S1
popov/L1P1V1XD
popředí/S1
porozumění/S1N1
posilování/S1N1
postoj/S1
posílání/S1N1
potok/L1R1
potvrzení/S1N1
potštejn/L1R1
poučování/S1N1
povolání/S1N1
povědomí/S1
poznání/S1N1
počínání/S1N1
poříčí/S1
prales/L1
praní/S1N1
prešov/L1
princeton/L1
probouzení/S1N1
proboštov/L1
prodlužování/S1N1
prohlížení/S1N1
prokrvení/S1N1
proměnění/S1N1
proplacení/S1N1
propůjčení/S1N1
prostudování/S1N1
prostějov/L1
prostředek/Q1L1
protivanov/L1
protivín/L1R1
proudění/S1N1
prověřování/S1N1
prstenec/S1
prunéřov/L1
putování/S1N1
pátrání/S1N1
púchov/L1
přebudování/S1N1
předjaří/S1
předpolí/S1
předsálí/S1
předání/S1N1
přehrávání/S1N1
překládání/S1N1
přelévání/S1N1
přenesení/S1N1
přerov/L1
přerozdělení/S1N1
přestání/S1N1
přetváření/S1N1
převáděč/S1
přeřazení/S1N1
přidružení/S1N1
přihlížení/S1N1
připojení/S1N1
přispění/S1N1
přivolení/S1N1
přiřazení/S1N1
příměří/S1
příšeří/S1
radotín/L1R1
rakovník/L1
ranec/S1
rašín/L1R1P1V1XD
reptání/S1N1
rostov/L1
roudnice/S1
rousínov/L1
rozdělení/S1N1
rozhořčení/S1N1
rozlišování/S1N1
rozmrazování/S1N1
rozpracování/S1N1
roztrhání/S1N1
rozvadov/L1
rozvrstvení/S1N1
rozřešení/S1N1
rožmberk/L1
rožnov/L1
rudolfov/L1
rumburk/L1
ručení/S1N1
rváčov/L1
rybník/L1R1
rychnov/L1
rájec/S1
rýmařov/L1
sbírání/S1N1
sdružení/S1N1
sebepoznání/S1
sedlec/S1
selhání/S1N1
seskupení/S1N1
setrvávání/S1N1
seřizování/S1N1
silvestr/H1L1
sjednocení/S1N1
sklep/L1
sklepení/S1
skuhrov/L1
skupování/S1N1
slavičín/L1R1
slavkov/L1
slavoj/S1
složení/S1N1
smokovec/S1
smíchov/L1
snažení/S1N1
sobectví/S1
sobotín/L1R1
sokolov/L1P1V1XD
souostroví/S1
soustátí/S1
soužití/S1N1
splacení/S1N1
spojování/S1N1
spoléhání/S1N1
spoření/S1N1
spořilov/L1
spřežení/S1N1
srpen/L1
stanovení/S1N1
staropramen/L1
staňkov/L1
stažení/S1N1
stochov/L1
stod/L1
stoupání/S1N1
strahov/L1
strážov/L1
stržení/S1N1
stáčení/S1N1
střekov/L1
střetávání/S1N1
střížkov/L1
suchdol/L1
sušení/S1N1
svinov/L1
svojanov/L1
svržení/S1N1
svádov/L1
svědění/S1N1
svět/L1
sychrov/L1
sýr/L1
tachov/L1
taj/S1
tasov/L1
taxík/H1L1
tažení/S1N1
temelín/L1R1
terezín/L1R1
tetín/L1R1
tisíciletí/S1
tišnov/L1
tištín/L1R1
tlumačov/L1
torpédoborec/S1
tovačov/L1
točník/L1
trabant/L1
trenčín/L1R1
trocnov/L1
trojúhelník/H1L1
trutnov/L1
trvání/S1N1
turnov/L1
turín/L1P1V1XD
tušení/S1N1
tápání/S1N1
týn/L1R1P1V1XD
třemošnice/S1
třemšín/L1
ubrání/S1N1
uctění/S1N1
uhrazení/S1N1
uklízení/S1N1
umrtvení/S1N1
upevnění/S1N1
uposlechnutí/S1N1
urychlení/S1N1
uskupení/S1N1
usnutí/S1N1
ustání/S1N1
utonutí/S1N1
uvedení/S1N1
uvědomění/S1N1
uznávání/S1N1
vacov/L1
varování/S1N1
vaňov/L1
velešín/L1R1
velitelství/S1
vepřín/L1
vilémov/L1
vinařství/S1
vir/L1
vlnění/S1N1
vnímání/S1N1
vracení/S1N1
vracov/L1
vratimov/L1
vtělení/S1N1
vybírání/S1N1
vydírání/S1N1
vyhledávač/S1
vyhotovení/S1N1
vyhýbání/S1N1
vyklizení/S1N1
vykradení/S1N1
vylosování/S1N1
vymazání/S1N1
vyměření/S1N1
vyobrazení/S1N1
vypořádání/S1N1
vypršení/S1N1
vyrovnání/S1N1
vyslechnutí/S1N1
vystoupení/S1N1
vysvědčení/S1N1
vytažení/S1N1
vytápění/S1N1
vyvedení/S1N1
vyvrcholení/S1N1
vyznamenání/S1N1
vyústění/S1N1
vyřazování/S1N1
vyškov/L1
vyšívání/S1N1
vzetí/S1N1
vzpomínání/S1N1
válčení/S1N1
vítkov/L1
víření/S1N1
výstroj/S1Z1
vějíř/S1
věštění/S1N1
xaverov/L1
zablokování/S1N1
zacházení/S1N1
zaklepání/S1N1
zamyšlení/S1N1
zaplacení/S1N1
zapůjčení/S1N1
zastání/S1N1
zavedení/S1N1
začlenění/S1N1
zbiroh/L1
zbýšov/L1
zcizení/S1N1
zdání/S1N1
zhoršení/S1N1
zkreslování/S1N1
zlechov/L1
zlíchov/L1
zmizení/S1N1
znečištění/S1N1
znění/S1N1
zpochybnění/S1N1
zpřístupnění/S1N1
zvelebení/S1N1
zvíkov/L1
zvýšení/S1N1
záchod/H1L1
zápěstí/S1
zítřek/L1
zřeknutí/S1N1
únor/L1
úskalí/S1
úsov/L1
čarování/S1N1
čebín/L1R1
čerchov/L1
červen/L1
čtvrtletí/S1
řádění/S1N1
říjen/L1
šanov/L1
šenov/L1
špaček/P1I1V1L1XD
štramberk/L1
štětín/L1
švermov/L1
šílenství/S1
žamberk/L1
život/L1
žofín/L1
žvanění/S1N1
sklep/XAL1
